Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB781.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 217. Infant and Toddler Care Professionals Salary Supplement.--(a) The department shall establish, implement and administer a pilot salary supplement program to provide salary supplements to child-care center employes assigned to work directly with children under four years of age, to which the following shall apply:(1) The purpose of the program shall be to create parity in 123456789101112131415161718 pay across assigned age groups to prevent losing employes who work with infants and toddlers due to changes in pre-kindergarten employment salaries.(2) The department shall establish standards for providing salary supplements under the program, which may:(i) include determining parity on a county level; and(ii) be scaled by education and certification.(3) The department shall issue salary supplements under the program no later than September 30, 2026, for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and no later than September 30 for each subsequent fiscal year.(b) A child-care center that receives money under the program shall only use the money to supplement wages and salaries. Money received under the program may not supplant the child-care center's money in a manner designed to intentionally lower wages or payroll costs.(c) To verify a child-care center's eligibility to participate in the program, the department shall:(1) Subject to subsection (d), review the personnel records of each child-care center to confirm current salaries for each pilot year.(2) Monitor salary supplements, employe retention rates and advancement of employe education or certification. The department shall provide the information gathered under this paragraph and recommendations on how the program may be continued beyond the program's expiration under subsection (g), to the General Assembly within one year of expiration of the pilot program.(d) The department may only review personnel records of a child-care center to the extent necessary to fulfill the duties 20250HB0781PN0802 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this section, unless otherwise specified under this section.(e) Prior to the first pilot year, and for each subsequent year, the department shall provide the General Assembly with an appropriation estimate necessary to cover the cost of all reported salary supplements.(f) No later than August 31, 2026, and each August 31 thereafter, an amount equal to or less than the estimate provided to the General Assembly under subsection (e) shall be appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the payment of salary supplements under the program.(g) The program shall expire upon the expiration of the third fiscal year for which the department provides salary supplements under this section.(h) The department shall adopt rules and promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child-care center" means any premises that operates for profit in which child care is provided simultaneously for seven or more children who are not relatives of the operator. The term does not include a center operating under social service auspices or a center that is an approved provider under the Pennsylvania Pre-K Counts Program established under section 1512-D of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."Program" means the pilot salary supplement program established under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0781PN0802 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829